Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 27 Motor Vehicle Offenses
31-27-2.8.
Ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing imposed as a part of sentence — Requirements.

Any person subject to suspension pursuant to §§

31-27-2.1(b)(1)

and

31-27-2.1(b)(2)

or convicted under the provisions of §

31-27-2(d)(1)

, §

31-27-2(d)(2)

, §

31-27-2(d)(3)(i)

, or §

31-27-2(d)(3)(ii)

, or whose violation is sustained under the provisions of §§

31-27-2.1(b)(1)

and 31- 27-2.1(b)(2), may be prohibited by the sentencing judge or magistrate from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system, and/or blood and urine testing by a licensed physician with knowledge and clinical experience in the diagnosis and treatment of drug-related disorders, a licensed or certified psychologist, social worker, or EAP professional with like knowledge, or a substance abuse counselor certified by the National Association of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Counselors (all of whom shall be licensed in Rhode Island), pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this chapter, if a Rhode Island traffic tribunal magistrate makes a finding that a motorist was operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle, or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof, but not intoxicating liquor based on a preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates no blood alcohol concentration or both, the magistrate may exercise his or her discretion and eliminate the requirement of an ignition interlock system; provided, that blood and/or urine testing is mandated as a condition to operating a motor vehicle as provided in this section.

Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this chapter, if a Rhode Island traffic tribunal magistrate makes a finding that a motorist was operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle, or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof and intoxicating liquor based on a preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates blood alcohol concentration or both, the magistrate may require an ignition interlock system in addition to blood and/or urine testing as a condition to operating a motor vehicle as provided in this section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this chapter, any mandatory period of license suspension shall, upon request, be reduced by the imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing ordered by the court or traffic tribunal as follows:

For a violation of §

31-27-2(d)(1)

, a person shall be subject to a minimum thirty-day (30) license suspension and an imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for three (3) months to one year.

For a violation of §

31-27-2.1(c)(1)

, a person shall be subject to a minimum thirty-day (30) license suspension and an imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for a period of six (6) months to two (2) years.

For a violation of §

31-27-2(d)(2)

, a person shall be subject to a minimum forty-five-day (45) license suspension and an imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for a period of six (6) months to two (2) years.

For a violation of §

31-27-2.1(c)(2)

, a person shall be subject to a minimum sixty-day (60) license suspension and an imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for a period of one to four (4) years.

For a violation of §

31-27-2(d)(3)

, a person shall be subject to a minimum sixty-day (60) license suspension and imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for a period of one to four (4) years.

For a violation of §

31-27-2.1(c)(3)

, a person shall be subject to a minimum ninety-day (90) license suspension and imposition of an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for a period of two (2) to ten (10) years.

No license suspension shall be subject to more than a thirty-day (30) license suspension based solely upon the imposition of an ignition interlock system.

If a conviction pursuant to §

31-27-2(d)(1)

or §

31-27-2.1(c)(1)

is a first offense, or upon an initial suspension pursuant to §

31-27-2.1(b)(1)

, where there has been a finding or determination that the motorist was under the influence of intoxicating liquor only, the magistrate shall, upon request, immediately grant a conditional hardship license after a finding of need pursuant to this section and upon proof of the installation of an ignition interlock device.

If a conviction pursuant to § 31-27-2(d)(1) or § 31-27-2.1(c)(1) is a first offense, or upon an initial suspension pursuant to §

31-27-2.1(b)(1)

, where there has been a finding or determination that the motorist was under the influence of drugs, toluene, or a controlled substance, but not intoxicating liquor, the judge or magistrate shall, upon request immediately grant a conditional hardship license after a finding of need pursuant to this section and upon proof of blood and urine testing pursuant to this section.

If a conviction pursuant to § 31-27-2(d)(1) or § 31-27-2.1(c)(1) is a first offense, or upon an initial suspension pursuant to § 31-27-2.1(b)(1), where there has been a finding or determination that the motorist was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, a controlled substance, or any combination thereof, the magistrate shall, upon request immediately grant a conditional hardship license after a finding of need pursuant to this section and upon proof of the installation of an ignition interlock device, subject also to the following testing:

The testing of either blood or urine is being performed by or monitored by a licensed physician with knowledge and clinical experience in the diagnosis and treatment of drug-related disorders, a licensed or certified psychologist, social worker, or EAP professional with like knowledge, or a substance abuse counselor certified by the National Association of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Counselors (all of whom shall be licensed in Rhode Island).

The motorist is required to pay for the substance abuse professional, any testing, retesting, monitoring, and reporting costs of the blood and urine testing.

Samples are to be collected, tested and confirmed by a federally certified laboratory by means of gas chromatography/mass spectrometry or technology recognized as being at least as scientifically accurate.

Samples are to be taken weekly for the first sixty (60) days, thereafter in accordance with the recommendation of the substance abuse professional. The samples taken thereafter may be ordered randomly, but must be provided by the motorist within twenty-four (24) hours of the request. The substance abuse professional shall report to the department of the attorney general within twenty-four (24) hours any failure by the motorist to comply with a request for a sample.

A positive test of urine or blood that evidences any controlled substances shall be reported by the substance abuse professional to the motorist and to the department of the attorney general within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the results. The motorist may, at his or her own expense, have an opportunity to have the sample retested or reevaluated by an independent testing facility which shall provide the result directly to the substance abuse professional. The attorney general may request, at any time, a copy of any or all test results from the substance abuse professional, who shall forward the requested results within forty-eight (48) hours.

Upon completion of the license suspension, conditional hardship, ignition interlock and substance abuse testing periods, a finalized report shall be presented to the department of motor vehicles prior to any license reinstatement.

If a judge or magistrate determines that a motorist either failed, without good cause, to comply with a sample request or tested positive for any controlled substance, he or she may exercise his or her discretion and revoke the conditional hardship license, extend the time period for the ignition interlock system and/or substance abuse testing for an additional period of up to twelve (12) months and/or impose an additional loss of license for up to twenty-four (24) months.

A motorist who has failed, without good cause, to comply with a sample request or tested positive for any controlled substance for a second time within twelve (12) months of the first failure and/or positive test determination shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by up to one year imprisonment, or a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

However, in any case where a motorist is convicted of an alcohol-related offense pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the judge or magistrate may exercise his or her discretion in the granting of the hardship license by imposing up to a ninety (90) day loss of license prior to any imposition of the hardship license. The hardship license shall be valid for twelve (12) continuous hours per day for any valid reason approved in advance by the sentencing judge or magistrate, which shall include employment, medical appointments, job training, schooling, or religious purposes. The hardship license shall not be for less than twelve (12) continuous hours per day. A hardship license shall only be granted in conjunction with the installation of an ignition interlock device and/or blood and urine testing. Any conditional driving privileges must be set by the sentencing judge or magistrate after a hearing in which the motorist must provide proof of employment status and hours of employment, or any other legitimate reasons justifying a hardship license. These shall include, but not be limited to, any unemployment training, schooling, medical appointments, therapy treatments, or any other valid requests set forth by sworn affidavit. Once said hardship period has concluded, the motorist must still be subject to the conditions of the ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as set forth under this section for the period of time as directed by the court. Any individual who violates the requirements of this subsection shall be subject to the penalties enumerated in §

31-11-18.1

.

Any person convicted of an offense of driving under the influence of liquor or drugs resulting in death, §

31-27-2.2

; driving under the influence of liquor or drugs resulting in serious bodily injury, §

31-27-2.6

; driving to endanger resulting in death, §

31-27-1

; or driving to endanger resulting in serious bodily injury, §

31-27-1

.1; may, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an approved ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for one to five (5) years.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle with a suspended license during the period of suspension, and the reason for the suspension was due to a conviction of driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol or a sustained violation or conviction of refusal to submit to a chemical test, shall be subject to the further use of the ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing for a period of six (6) months subsequent to the penalties enumerated in §

31-11-18.1

.

When the court orders the use of an ignition interlock system, the judge or magistrate shall cause an appropriate notation to be made on the person’s record that clearly sets forth the requirement for, and the period of the use of, the ignition interlock system.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (f) of this section, the court or traffic tribunal shall:

Require proof of the installation of the ignition interlock system and periodic reporting by the person for the purpose of verification of the proper operation of the ignition interlock system;

Require the person to have the ignition interlock system monitored for the proper use and accuracy by a person, firm, corporation, or other association to be approved by the division of motor vehicles at least once every six (6) months, or more frequently as the circumstances may require; and

Require the person to pay the reasonable cost of leasing or buying, monitoring, and maintenance of the ignition interlock system.

The requirements under subsection (g) of this section shall be the responsibility of the probation department or justice assistance, if the individual is under their control, or the division of motor vehicles if the individual is not monitored as a condition of the individual’s plea or finding of guilt.

Any person granted a conditional hardship license upon proof of installation of an ignition interlock device, may operate that motor vehicle during the entire twelve-hour (12) period of operation granted by the sentencing judge or magistrate including during the scope of the person’s employment and/or any other valid reason approved by the sentencing judge or magistrate.

If a person is required, in the course of the person’s employment, to operate a motor vehicle owned or provided by the person’s employer, the person may operate that motor vehicle in the course of the person’s employment without installation of an ignition interlock system if the court makes specific findings expressly permitting the person to operate, in the course of the person’s employment, a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system.

Any person subject to an ignition interlock order and/or blood and urine testing who violates such order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by up to one year imprisonment, or a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

For a second violation within six (6) months from entry of the order, the person violating the order shall be imprisoned for a term of not less than ten (10) days and not more than one year.

For the purposes of this subsection, a violation of the interlock order, includes, but is not limited to:

Altering, tampering, or in any way attempting to circumvent the operation of an ignition interlock system that has been installed in the motor vehicle of a person under this section;

Operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system; or

Soliciting or attempting to have another person start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock system for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person who is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system.

Any person who attempts to start, or starts, a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock system, tampers with, or in any way attempts to circumvent, the operation of an ignition interlock system that has been installed in the motor vehicle for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person who is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by up to one year imprisonment or a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 405, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 12, effective June 28, 2022.

31-27-2.9.
Administration of chemical test.

Notwithstanding any provision of §

31-27-2.1

, if an individual refuses to consent to a chemical test as provided in §

31-27-2.1

, and a peace officer, as defined in §

12-7-21

, has probable cause to believe that the individual has violated one or more of the following sections:

31-27-1

,

31-27-1

.1,

31-27-2.2

, or

31-27-2.6

and that the individual was operating a motor vehicle under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, toluene or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 21-28, or any combination thereof, a chemical test may be administered without the consent of that individual provided that the peace officer first obtains a search warrant authorizing administration of the chemical test. The chemical test shall determine the amount of the alcohol or the presence of a controlled substance in that person’s blood, saliva or breath.

The chemical test shall be administered in accordance with the methods approved by the director of the department of health as provided for in subdivision

31-27-2(c)(4)

. The individual shall be afforded the opportunity to have an additional chemical test as established in subdivision

31-27-2(c)(6)

.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, chapter 5-37.3, any health care provider who, as authorized by the search warrant in subsection (a):

Takes a blood, saliva or breath sample from an individual; or

Performs the chemical test; or

Provides information to a peace officer pursuant to subsection (a) above and who uses reasonable care and accepted medical practices shall not be liable in any civil or criminal proceeding arising from the taking of the sample, from the performance of the chemical test or from the disclosure or release of the test results.

The results of a chemical test performed pursuant to this section shall be admissible as competent evidence in any civil or criminal prosecution provided that evidence is presented in compliance with the conditions set forth in subdivisions

31-27-2(c)(3)

,

31-27-2(c)(4)

and

31-27-2(c)(6)

.

All chemical tests administered pursuant to this section shall be audio and video recorded by the law enforcement agency which applied for and was granted the search warrant authorizing the administration of the chemical test.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 210, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 12, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 12, effective May 25, 2022.

31-27-3.
Right of person charged with operating under influence to physical examination.

A person arrested and charged with operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of narcotic drugs or intoxicating liquor, whatever its alcoholic content, shall have the right to be examined at his or her own expense immediately after the person’s arrest by a physician selected by the person, and the officer so arresting or so charging the person shall immediately inform the person of this right and afford the person a reasonable opportunity to exercise the right, and at the trial of the person the prosecution must prove that he or she was so informed and was afforded that opportunity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 24, § 2; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-3

.

31-27-3.1.
Annual Impaired Driving Report.

The attorney general, with the cooperation of state and municipal police departments, with the district court, the traffic tribunal and the department of transportation shall annually, on or before, the 30th day of April of each year, prepare a written report to the general assembly identifying all cases where an individual is charged with an offense under §

31-27-1

through §

31-27-2.8

of the general laws. The report shall include the numbers of cases charged under each statute, as well as the disposition in each case charged, if any.

In addition to the number of cases charged and their disposition, the report shall identify the number of cases which are filed with dual charges of driving under the influence under §

31-27-1

and refusal to submit to a chemical test under §

31-27-2

, and the disposition of each of these dual charges.

The report shall also identify, in any alcohol or drug related fatality charged under §§

31-27-1

—

31-27-8

of the general laws, whether the driver of the motor vehicle, a passenger in the motor vehicle or a pedestrian was identified by law enforcement, the medical examiner or any other entity as being under the influence of alcohol or drugs in the fatal accident.

The attorney general shall promulgate any rule or regulation necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 235, § 2.

31-27-4.
Reckless driving and other offenses against public safety.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle recklessly so that the lives or safety of the public might be endangered, or operates a vehicle in an attempt to elude or flee from a traffic officer or police vehicle, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the first conviction and a felony for the second and each subsequent conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 24, § 3; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 3; P.L. 1954, ch. 3300, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3819, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 70, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1967, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 193, § 2.

31-27-4.1.
Eluding a law enforcement officer with a motor vehicle in a high speed pursuit.

Any person who in an attempt to elude or flee from a police officer in an emergency police vehicle in a high speed pursuit of the person, operates a motor vehicle at speeds greater than fifteen (15) miles per hour over the speed limit, or who causes property damage only in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000):

For the first conviction, may be subject to the following sanctions:

Up to one year incarceration at the adult correction institutions (A.C.I.) and a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);

License suspension of not less than ninety (90) days but not more than six (6) months and forfeiture of the motor vehicle.

For a second or subsequent conviction, the person shall:

Be sentenced to two (2) years at the A.C.I., but not more than five (5) years;

Be fined a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000) but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000);

Receive a license suspension of not less than one year but not more than five (5) years; and

Forfeit the motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 203, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 193, § 2.

31-27-4.2.
Minimal requirements.

In any criminal action brought under §

31-27-4.1

or

31-27-4.2

in which a high speed pursuit occurs, the following definitions and minimal requirements of the high speed pursuit shall apply and shall be complied with by the charging police department.

Any police department charging a suspect under the provisions of this chapter shall limit the use of continued high speed vehicular pursuits to those situations which involve:

The attempted apprehension of persons wanted for the commission of felonious and/or misdemeanor acts that threaten, have threatened, or will threaten the health, life, or safety of a person or persons; or

The pursuit of a motor vehicle operator who has committed flagrant moving motor vehicle violations which have endangered the lives and safety of others, and was operating in a reckless manner before the pursuit was initiated, and is continuing to operate in a manner that recklessly endangers the lives and safety of others, including, but not limited to, driving under the influence of liquor or drugs.

Definition. A “high speed pursuit” is the active attempt by a police officer in an authorized emergency vehicle to apprehend the occupants of a running motor vehicle at speeds in excess of fifteen miles per hour (15 MPH) over the speed limit.

Responsibilities of pursuing officer(s). Upon initiation of a high speed pursuit the officer(s) shall:

As soon as practical communicate to his or her dispatcher his or her location and direction of travel.

Provide the reason for the high speed pursuit.

Communicate the ongoing status of the pursuit at regular intervals including any significant change of circumstances which might affect the decision to either continue or discontinue the pursuit.

Activate all audio (sirens) and visual (emergency lights) warning devices until the high speed pursuit is terminated.

Adhere to all the provisions of §§

31-12-6

through

31-12-9

.

Terminate the high speed pursuit when in his or her judgment the dangers created by the pursuit outweigh the need for immediate apprehension.

Responsibilities of the officer in charge and/or field supervisor. In all continued high speed pursuit situations, command responsibility rests with the officer in charge and/or the field supervisor. It shall be the duty of the officer in charge and/or the field supervisor to provide adequate supervision to the officer involved in the high speed pursuit and to:

Track the location of the pursuit.

Review and consider as many facts of the pursuit as are available.

Consider the potential and real dangers of the continuation of the pursuit.

Order the termination of the high speed pursuit when in his or her judgment the dangers created by the pursuit outweigh the need for immediate apprehension.

Interjurisdictional pursuits. Whenever there exists the possibility of a high speed pursuit extending into another jurisdiction, the officer in charge shall order the surrounding jurisdictions to be notified of the high speed pursuit and of its potential for extending into their jurisdictions. If the high speed pursuit enters a jurisdiction different from the jurisdiction from which it began, then the high speed pursuit policy of the entered jurisdiction shall apply and control and the entered jurisdiction shall have the authority consistent with its policies to terminate the high speed pursuit. For purposes of this chapter, the state police shall have statewide jurisdiction.

Reports. Whenever a high speed pursuit occurs, each officer involved shall submit a written report to be kept on file of his or her participation in the pursuit and the factual reasons justifying the officer’s participation in the pursuit.

The officer in charge shall also file a written report giving a complete account of the pursuit including his or her factual reason for continuing or terminating the pursuit.

Each police department shall enact policies and procedures which are consistent with these minimum requirements and to provide copies of those policies to the attorney general’s department.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create any additional civil liability upon individuals or their employers who engage in high speed pursuits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 193, § 3.

31-27-4.3.
Forfeiture of motor vehicle.

Any motor vehicle including, but not limited to, cars, trucks, vessels, or motorcycles, which has been or is being used in violation of §

31-27-4.1

, may be seized and upon conviction forfeited; provided, that no motor vehicle as enumerated in this section used by any person shall be forfeited under the provisions of this chapter unless it shall appear that the owner of the vehicle had knowledge, actual or constructive, and was a consenting party to the alleged illegal act.

The motor vehicle taken or detained under this section shall not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure. Whenever a motor vehicle is forfeited under this chapter it shall be retained and utilized by the law enforcement agency that seized the vehicle where the use of the vehicle is reasonably related to the law enforcement duties of the seizing agency. If the seized vehicle is inappropriate for use by law enforcement agency for reasons including, but not limited to, style, size, or color, the seizing agency shall be allowed to apply the proceeds of sale or the trade-in value of the vehicle towards the purchase of an appropriate vehicle for use for activities reasonably related to law enforcement duties.

As to the proceeds from the sale of the property under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the distribution shall be as follows:

All proceeds of the forfeiture of the motor vehicle shall be distributed as follows: all costs of advertising administrative forfeitures and costs for any damage to any state or municipal vehicles which occurred as a result of the high speed pursuit shall first be deducted from the amount forfeited. Of the remainder, eighty percent (80%) of the proceeds shall be divided among the state and local law enforcement agencies proportionately based upon their contribution to the investigation of the criminal activity related to the asset being forfeited, and twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds shall be provided to the state victims’ indemnity fund.

Each state or local law enforcement agency shall be entitled to keep the proceeds from sales of forfeited vehicles. The funds shall be used for law enforcement purposes. The funds received by a state law enforcement agency shall be maintained in a separate account by the general treasurer. The funds received by a local law enforcement agency shall be maintained in a separate account by the local agency’s city or town treasurer.

Each law enforcement agency making any seizure(s) which result(s) in a forfeiture pursuant to this section shall certify and file with the state treasurer between January 1 and January 30 an annual report detailing the vehicle or money forfeited during the previous calendar year and the use or disposition of the property or money. The report shall be made in the form and manner that may be provided or specified by the treasurer and the annual law enforcement agency reports as provided in this subsection shall be provided to the local governmental body governing the agency and to the house and senate judiciary committees.

Any law enforcement agency whose duty it is to enforce the laws of this state is empowered to authorize designated officers or agents to carry out the seizure provisions of this chapter. It shall be the duty of any officer or agent so authorized or designated or authorized by law, upon or by means of which any violation of this chapter has taken place or is taking place, to seize the vehicle and to place it in the custody of the person who is authorized or designated for that purpose by the respective law enforcement agency pursuant to those provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 193, § 3.

31-27-4.4.
Motor vehicle forfeiture procedure.

Any criminal complaint, information, or indictment charging a violation of §

31-27-4.1

shall set forth with reasonable particularity the motor vehicle that the attorney general seeks to forfeit pursuant to this section.

The court may, upon application of the attorney general, enter a restraining order or injunction, require any person claiming any interest in the subject vehicle to execute a satisfactory performance bond to the state, or take any other action to preserve the availability of the vehicle subject to forfeiture described in §

31-27-4.3

, whether prior or subsequent to the filing of a complaint, indictment, or information.

Written notice and an opportunity for a hearing shall be afforded to persons appearing to have an interest in the vehicle, the hearing, however, to be limited to the issues of whether:

There is a substantial probability that the state will prevail on the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the order will result in the vehicle being destroyed, conveyed, encumbered or further encumbered, removed from the jurisdiction of the court, depreciated in value or otherwise made unavailable for forfeiture; and

The need to preserve the availability of the vehicle through the entry of the requested order outweighs the hardship on any party against whom the order is to be entered.

A temporary restraining order under this section may be entered upon application of the attorney general without notice or opportunity for a hearing when a complaint, information, or indictment has not yet been filed with respect to the vehicle if the attorney general demonstrates that there is probable cause to believe that the vehicle with respect to which the order is sought would, in the event of conviction, be subject to forfeiture under §

31-27-4.3

and that provision of notice will jeopardize the availability of the vehicle for forfeiture. The temporary restraining order shall expire within ten (10) days of the date on which it is entered unless extended for good cause shown or unless the party against whom it is entered consents to an extension for a longer period.

A hearing requested by any party in interest concerning an order entered under this subsection shall be held at the earliest possible time and prior to the expiration of the temporary order.

The court may receive and consider, at the hearing held pursuant to this subsection, evidence and information that would be inadmissible in court.

Upon conviction of a person for the covered offense, the court may enter a judgment of forfeiture of the vehicle described in §

31-27-4.1

to the state and may also authorize the attorney general to seize the motor vehicle ordered forfeited upon any terms and conditions that the court shall deem proper. Following the entry of an order declaring the vehicle forfeited, the court may, upon application of the attorney general:

Enter appropriate restraining orders or injunctions;

Require the execution of satisfactory performance bonds, appoint receivers, conservators, appraisers, accountants, or trustees; or

Take any other action to protect the interest of the state in the property ordered forfeited.

All right, title, and interest in the vehicle described in §

31-27-4.1

vests in the state upon the commission of the act giving rise to forfeiture under this chapter. Any such vehicle that is subsequently transferred to any person may be the subject of a special verdict of forfeiture and shall be ordered forfeited to the state, unless the transferee establishes in a hearing pursuant to subsection (f) of this section that he or she is a bona fide purchaser for value of the vehicle who at the time of purchase was reasonably without cause to believe that the vehicle was subject to forfeiture.

Procedures subsequent to the special verdict of forfeiture shall be as follows:

Following the entry of an order of forfeiture under this section, the state shall publish notice of the order and of its intent to dispose of the vehicle once per week for at least three (3) weeks in any manner that the attorney general may provide by regulation. The attorney general shall also, to the extent practicable, provide written notice to all parties known to have an interest in the vehicle and all parties whose identity is reasonably subject to discovery and who may have an interest in the forfeited vehicle.

Any person, other than the defendant, asserting any interest in the vehicle that has been ordered forfeited to the state pursuant to this section may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the final publication of notice or his or her receipt of notice under subdivision (1) of this subsection, whichever is earlier, petition the court for a hearing to adjudicate the validity of his or her alleged interest in the vehicle.

The petition shall be signed by the petitioner under penalty of perjury and shall set forth the nature and extent of the petitioner’s right, title, or interest in the vehicle; any additional facts supporting the petitioner’s claim; and the relief sought.

The hearing on the petition shall, to the extent practicable and consistent with the interest of justice, be held within thirty (30) days of the filing of the petition. The court may consolidate the hearing on the petition with a hearing on any other petition filed by a person other than the defendant and concerning the same vehicle.

At a hearing, the petitioner may testify and present evidence and witnesses on his or her own behalf, and cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. The state may present evidence and witnesses in rebuttal and in defense of its claim to the vehicle and cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. In addition to testimony and evidence presented at the hearing, the court shall consider the relevant portions of the record of the criminal case that resulted in the order of forfeiture.

In accordance with its findings at the hearing, the court shall amend the order of forfeiture if it determines that the petitioner has established by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The petitioner has a right, title, or interest in the vehicle, and the right, title or interest was vested in the petitioner rather than the defendant or was superior to any right, title, or interest of the defendant at the time of the commission of the acts which gave rise to the forfeiture of the vehicle under this section; or

The petitioner is a bona fide purchaser for value of any right, title or interest in the vehicle and was at the time of purchase reasonably without cause to believe that the property was subject to forfeiture under this section.

Following the court’s disposition of all petitions filed under this section, or if no such petitions are filed, following the expiration of the period provided in this section for the filing of the petitions, the state shall have clear title to the vehicle that is the subject of the order of forfeiture and shall transfer good and sufficient title to any subsequent purchaser, transferee, or fund as provided in this chapter.

Except as provided in this section, no party claiming an interest in the vehicle subject to forfeiture under this section may:

Intervene in a trial or appeal of a criminal case involving the forfeiture of the property; or

Commence any action against the state concerning the validity of the alleged interest.

In order to facilitate the identification or location of the vehicle declared forfeited and to facilitate the disposition of petitions filed pursuant to this section after the entry of an order declaring a vehicle forfeited to the state, the court may, upon application of the attorney general, order that the testimony of any witness relating to the forfeited vehicle be taken by deposition and that any designated book, paper, document, record, recording (electronic or otherwise), or other material not privileged, be produced at the same time and place, in the same manner as provided for the taking of depositions under the Rules of Civil Procedure.

If the vehicle described in §

31-27-4.1

: (1) cannot be located; (2) has been transferred to, sold to or deposited with a third party; (3) has been placed beyond the jurisdiction of the court; (4) has been substantially diminished in value by any act or omission of the defendant; the court shall order the forfeiture of any other property of the defendant up to the value of the subject property.

The court shall have jurisdiction to enter orders as provided in this section without regard to the location of any property that may be subject to forfeiture under this section or that has been ordered forfeited under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 193, § 3.

31-27-4.5.
Educational requirement.

The provisions of this chapter shall be taught in all driver training courses given within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 193, § 3.